linkhttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Policy

A policy is a deliberate system of principles to guide decisions and achieve rational outcomes. A policy is a statement of intent, and is implemented as a procedure or protocol. Policies are generally adopted by the Board of or senior governance body within an organization whereas procedures or protocols would be developed and adopted by senior executive officers. Policies can assist in both subjective and objective decision making. Policies to assist in subjective decision making would usually assist senior management with decisions that must consider the relative merits of a number of factors before making decisions and as a result are often hard to objectively test e.g. work-life balance policy. In contrast policies to assist in objective decision making are usually operational in nature and can be objectively tested e.g. password policy. [1]

The term may apply to government, private sector organizations and groups, as well as individuals. Presidential executive orders, corporate privacy policies, and parliamentary rules of order are all examples of policy. Policy differs from rules or law. While law can compel or prohibit behaviors (e.g. a law requiring the payment of taxes on income), policy merely guides actions toward those that are most likely to achieve a desired outcome.[citation needed]

Policy or policy study may also refer to the process of making important organizational decisions, including the identification of different alternatives such as programs or spending priorities, and choosing among them on the basis of the impact they will have. Policies can be understood as political, management, financial, and administrative mechanisms arranged to reach explicit goals. In public corporate finance, a critical accounting policy is a policy for a firm/company or an industry which is considered to have a notably high subjective element, and that has a material impact on the financial statements.[citation needed]

Contents  [hide] 
1	Impact
1.1	Intended effects
1.2	Unintended effects
2	Policy cycle
3	Content
4	Typologies
4.1	Distributive policies
4.2	Regulatory policies
4.3	Constituent policies
4.4	Miscellaneous policies
5	Specific policy types
6	Other uses of the term
7	See also
8	Notes and references
9	Further reading
10	External links
Impact[edit]
Intended effects[edit]
The intended effects of a policy vary widely according to the organization and the context in which they are made. Broadly, policies are typically instituted to avoid some negative effect that has been noticed in the organization, or to seek some positive benefit.[citation needed]

Corporate purchasing policies provide an example of how organizations attempt to avoid negative effects. Many large companies have policies that all purchases above a certain value must be performed through a purchasing process. By requiring this standard purchasing process through policy, the organization can limit waste and standardize the way purchasing is done.[citation needed]

The State of California provides an example of benefit-seeking policy. In recent years, the numbers of hybrid cars in California has increased dramatically, in part because of policy changes in Federal law that provided USD $1,500 in tax credits (since phased out) as well as the use of high-occupancy vehicle lanes to hybrid owners (no longer available for new hybrid vehicles). In this case, the organization (state and/or federal government) created an effect (increased ownership and use of hybrid vehicles) through policy (tax breaks, highway lanes).[citation needed]

Unintended effects[edit]
Policies frequently have side effects or unintended consequences. Because the environments that policies seek to influence or manipulate are typically complex adaptive systems (e.g. governments, societies, large companies), making a policy change can have counterintuitive results. For example, a government may make a policy decision to raise taxes, in hopes of increasing overall tax revenue. Depending on the size of the tax increase, this may have the overall effect of reducing tax revenue by causing capital flight or by creating a rate so high that citizens are deterred from earning the money that is taxed. (See the Laffer curve.)[citation needed]

The policy formulation process theoretically includes an attempt to assess as many areas of potential policy impact as possible, to lessen the chances that a given policy will have unexpected or unintended consequences. Because of the nature of some complex adaptive systems such as societies and governments, it may not be possible to assess all possible impacts of a given policy.[citation needed]

Policy cycle[edit]
In political science, the policy cycle is a tool used for the analyzing of the development of a policy item. It can also be referred to as a "stagist approach", "stages heuristic" or "stages approach". It is thus a rule of thumb rather than the actual reality of how policy is created, but has been influential in how political scientists looked at policy in general.[2] It was developed as a theory from Harold Lasswell's work.

One version has the following stages:

Agenda setting (Problem identification) - The recognition of certain subject as a problem demanding further government attention.
Policy Formulation - Involves exploring a variation of options or alternative courses of action available for addressing the problem. (appraisal, dialogue, formulation, and consolidation)
Decision-making - Government decides on an ultimate course of action, whether to perpetuate the policy status quo or alter it. (Decision could be 'positive', 'negative', or 'no-action')
Implementation - The ultimate decision made earlier will be put into practice.
Evaluation - Assesses the effectiveness of a public policy in terms of its perceived intentions and results. Policy actors attempt to determine whether the course of action is a success or failure by examining its impact and outcomes.
An eight step policy cycle is developed in detail in The Australian Policy Handbook by Peter Bridgman and Glyn Davis: (now with Catherine Althaus in its 4th and 5th editions)

Issue identification
Policy analysis
Consultation (which permeates the entire process)
Policy instrument development
Building coordination and coalitions
Program Design: Decision making
Policy Implementation
Policy Evaluation
The Althaus, Bridgman & Davis model is heuristic and iterative. It is intentionally normative and not meant to be diagnostic or predictive. Policy cycles are typically characterized as adopting a classical approach, and tend to describe processes from the perspective of policy decision makers. Accordingly some postpositivist academics challenge cyclical models as unresponsive and unrealistic, preferring systemic and more complex models.[3] They consider a broader range of actors involved in the policy space that includes civil society organisations, the media, intellectuals, think tanks or policy research institutes, corporations, lobbyists, etc.

Content[edit]
Policies are typically promulgated through official written documents. Policy documents often come with the endorsement or signature of the executive powers within an organization to legitimize the policy and demonstrate that it is considered in force. Such documents often have standard formats that are particular to the organization issuing the policy. While such formats differ in form, policy documents usually contain certain standard components including[citation needed] :

A purpose statement, outlining why the organization is issuing the policy, and what its desired effect or outcome of the policy should be.
An applicability and scope statement, describing who the policy affects and which actions are impacted by the policy. The applicability and scope may expressly exclude certain people, organizations, or actions from the policy requirements. Applicability and scope is used to focus the policy on only the desired targets, and avoid unintended consequences where possible.
An effective date which indicates when the policy comes into force. Retroactive policies are rare, but can be found.
A responsibilities section, indicating which parties and organizations are responsible for carrying out individual policy statements. Many policies may require the establishment of some ongoing function or action. For example, a purchasing policy might specify that a purchasing office be created to process purchase requests, and that this office would be responsible for ongoing actions. Responsibilities often include identification of any relevant oversight and/or governance structures.
Policy statements indicating the specific regulations, requirements, or modifications to organizational behavior that the policy is creating. Policy statements are extremely diverse depending on the organization and intent, and may take almost any form.
Some policies may contain additional sections, including:

Background, indicating any reasons, history, and intent that led to the creation of the policy, which may be listed as motivating factors. This information is often quite valuable when policies must be evaluated or used in ambiguous situations, just as the intent of a law can be useful to a court when deciding a case that involves that law.
Definitions, providing clear and unambiguous definitions for terms and concepts found in the policy document.[citation needed]
Typologies[edit]
Theodore J. Lowi, famous American political scientist proposed four types of policy namely distributive, redistributive, regulatory and constituent in his article 'Four systems of Policy, Politics and Choice' and in 'American Business, Public Policy, Case Studies and Political Theory'. Policy addresses the intent of the organization, whether government, business, professional, or voluntary. Policy is intended to affect the 'real' world, by guiding the decisions that are made. Whether they are formally written or not, most organizations have identified policies.[citation needed]

Policies may be classified in many different ways. The following is a sample of several different types of policies broken down by their effect on members of the organization.

Distributive policies[edit]
Distributive policies extend goods and services to members of an organization, as well as distributing the costs of the goods/services amongst the members of the organization. Examples include government policies that impact spending for welfare, public education, highways, and public safety, or a professional organization's benefits plan.

Regulatory policies[edit]
Regulatory policies, or mandates, limit the discretion of individuals and agencies, or otherwise compel certain types of behavior. These policies are generally thought to be best applied when good behavior can be easily defined and bad behavior can be easily regulated and punished through fines or sanctions. An example of a fairly successful public regulatory policy is that of a speed limit.

Constituent policies[edit]
Constituent policies create executive power entities, or deal with laws. Constituent policies also deal with Fiscal Policy in some circumstances.[citation needed]

Miscellaneous policies[edit]
Policies are dynamic; they are not just static lists of goals or laws. Policy blueprints have to be implemented, often with unexpected results. Social policies are what happens 'on the ground' when they are implemented, as well as what happens at the decision making or legislative stage.

When the term policy is used, it may also refer to:

Official government policy (legislation or guidelines that govern how laws should be put into operation)
Broad ideas and goals in political manifestos and pamphlets
A company or organization's policy on a particular topic. For example, the equal opportunity policy of a company shows that the company aims to treat all its staff equally.
The actions the organization actually takes may often vary significantly from stated policy. This difference is sometimes caused by political compromise over policy, while in other situations it is caused by lack of policy implementation and enforcement. Implementing policy may have unexpected results, stemming from a policy whose reach extends further than the problem it was originally crafted to address. Additionally, unpredictable results may arise from selective or idiosyncratic enforcement of policy.[citation needed]

Types of policy analysis include:

Causal (resp. non-causal)
Deterministic (resp. stochastic, randomized and sometimes non-deterministic)
Index
Memoryless (e.g. non-stationary)
Opportunistic (resp. non-opportunistic)
Stationary (resp. non-stationary)
These qualifiers can be combined, so for example you could have a stationary-memoryless-index policy.

linkhttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Public_policy

Public policy is the principled guide to action taken by the administrative executive branches of the state with regard to a class of issues in a manner consistent with law and institutional customs. The foundation of public policy is composed of national constitutional laws and regulations. Further substrates include both judicial interpretations and regulations which are generally authorized by legislation. Public policy is considered strong when it solves problems efficiently and effectively, serves justice, supports governmental institutions and policies, and encourages active citizenship.[1]

Other scholars define it as a system of "courses of action, regulatory measures, laws, and funding priorities concerning a given topic promulgated by a governmental entity or its representatives."[2] Public policy is commonly embodied in "constitutions, legislative acts, and judicial decisions."[3]

In the United States, this concept refers not only to the result of policies, but more broadly to the decision-making and analysis of governmental decisions. As an academic discipline, public policy is studied by professors and students at public policy schools of major universities throughout the country. The U.S. professional association of public policy practitioners, researchers, scholars, and students is the Association for Public Policy Analysis and Management.

Contents  [hide] 
1	Government actions: the process of public policy making
2	As an academic discipline
3	Feminist politics and public policy
4	See also
5	References
6	Bibliography
7	Further reading
Government actions: the process of public policy making[edit]
Public policy making can be characterized as a dynamic, complex, and interactive system through which public problems are identified and countered by creating new public policy or by reforming existing public policy.[4] Public problems can originate in endless ways and require different policy responses (such as regulations, subsidies, quotas, and laws) on the local, national, or international level.[5]

Public policy making is a continuous process that has many feedback loops. Verification and evaluation are essential to the functioning of this system.[6] The public problems that influence public policy making can be of economic, social, or political nature.[7] Each system is influenced by different public problems and thus requires different public policy.[6]

In public policy making, numerous individuals and interest groups compete and collaborate to influence policymakers to act in a particular way.[8] The large set of actors in the public policy process, such as politicians, civil servants, lobbyists, domain experts, and industry representatives, use a variety of tactics and tools to advance their aims, including advocating their positions publicly, attempting to educate supporters and opponents, and mobilizing allies on a particular issue.[5] Many actors can be important in the public policy process, however, government officials ultimately choose the ‘public policy’ in response to the public issue or problem at hand. In doing so, government officials are expected to meet public sector ethics and take the needs of all stakeholders into account.[6]

Since societies have changed in the past decades the public policy making system changed too. Today public policy making is increasingly goal-oriented, aiming for measurable results and goals, and decision-centric, focussing on decisions that must be taken immediately.[6] Furthermore, mass communications and technological changes have caused the public policy system to become more complex and interconnected.[9] These changes pose new challenges to the current public policy systems and pressure them to evolve in order to remain effective and efficient.[6]

As an academic discipline[edit]
Main article: Public policy school
As an academic discipline, public policy brings in elements of many social science fields and concepts, including economics, sociology, political economy, program evaluation, policy analysis, and public management, all as applied to problems of governmental administration, management, and operations. At the same time, the study of public policy is distinct from political science or economics, in its focus on the application of theory to practice. While the majority of public policy degrees are master's and doctoral degrees, several universities also offer undergraduate education in public policy.

Traditionally, the academic field of public policy focused on domestic policy. However, the wave of economic globalization which occurred in the late 20th and early 21st centuries created a need for a subset of public policy that focuses on global governance, especially as it relates to issues that transcend national borders such as climate change, terrorism, nuclear proliferation, and economic development.[10] Consequently, many traditional public policy schools had to tweak their curricula to adjust to this new policy landscape, as well as developed whole new ones.[citation needed] The School of International Affairs at Pennsylvania State University, for example, was created as a response to a new transnational landscape. The School of International Affairs is grounded on international policy making, offering interdisciplinary training from various fields, such as law, political science, international relations, geography, sociology, and economics.[11]

Feminist politics and public policy[edit]
In feminist analysis of public policy, scholars tend to consider issues such as the welfare state, which focuses on labour practices, wages, employment and unemployment.[12] The early scholarship on the welfare state neglected efforts of women in social feminist organizations to help protect women and children who were not in the workforce.

Gendered analysis has assisted public policy by bringing forth real life issues women face visible to the public sphere;[13] issues such as pay equality, maternity and parental leave, childcare, domestic violence, and sexual assault, each one of public concern.[13] A new policy in effect in the UK in 2015 grants the new mother and father are able to “take time off together or in turns and have a legal right to request flexible working hours”.[14] When compared to the previous policies this recognizes the need for flexibility and the opportunity for fathers to play a larger role in caring for their children. This policy allows women to continue their roles in the workplace, despite motherhood, at the potential expense to the employer and consumer.

linkhttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Policy_analysis

Policy analysis is "determining which of various policies will most achieve a given set of goals in light of the relations between the policies and the goals."[1] However, policy analysis can be divided into two major fields. Analysis of existing policy which is analytical and descriptive—i.e., it attempts to explain policies and their development. Analysis for new policy which is prescriptive—i.e., it is involved with formulating policies and proposals (e.g., to improve social welfare).[2] The area of interest and the purpose of analysis determines what type of analysis is conducted. A combination of two kinds of policy analyses together with program evaluation would be defined as policy studies.[3]

Policy analysis is frequently deployed in the public sector, but is equally applicable to other kinds of organizations. Policy analysis has its roots in systems analysis as instituted by United States Secretary of Defense, Robert McNamara.[4]

Contents  [hide] 
1	Approaches
2	Methodology
2.1	Dimensions for analyzing policies
2.2	Five "E" approach
3	Evidence based Models
3.1	Types of Policies[10]
3.2	For Governments
3.2.1	Process model
3.3	For Public Institutions
3.3.1	Rational model
3.3.2	Incremental Policy
3.4	For Workplace
3.4.1	Group model
3.5	Techniques used in Policy Analysis
4	Evaluation
4.1	NCCHPP's 10 Steps for conducting a policy evaluation
5	See also
6	References
7	Further reading
8	External links
Approaches[edit]
Various approaches to policy analysis exist. The Analysis ‘of-for’ policy is the central approach in social science and educational policy studies which is linked to two different traditions of policy analysis and research frameworks. The approach of analysis ‘for’ policy refers to research conducted for actual policy development, often commissioned by policymakers inside the bureaucracy within which the policy is developed. Analysis ‘of’ policy is more of an academic exercise, conducted by academic researchers, seeking to understand why a particular policy was developed at a particular time and the effects, intended or otherwise, of that policy.[5]

There are, in addition three general approaches that can be distinguished: the analycentric, the policy process, and the meta-policy approach.[2]

The analycentric approach focuses on individual problems and their solutions; its scope is the micro-scale and its problem interpretation is usually of a technical nature. The primary aim is to identify the most effective and efficient solution in technical and economic terms (e.g. the most efficient allocation of resources).

The policy process approach puts its focal point onto political processes and involved stakeholders; its scope is the meso-scale and its problem interpretation is usually of a political nature. It aims at determining what processes and means are used and tries to explain the role and influence of stakeholders within the policy process. By changing the relative power and influence of certain groups (e.g., enhancing public participation and consultation), solutions to problems may be identified. One way of doing this followed a heuristic model called the policy cycle.

The meta-policy approach is a systems and context approach; i.e., its scope is the macro-scale and its problem interpretation is usually of a structural nature. It aims at explaining the contextual factors of the policy process; i.e., what are the political, economic and socio-cultural factors influencing it. As problems may result because of structural factors (e.g., a certain economic system or political institution), solutions may entail changing the structure itself.

Methodology[edit]
Policy analysis uses both qualitative methods and quantitative methods, including case studies, survey research, statistical analysis, and model building. A common practice is to define the problem and evaluation criteria; identify and evaluate alternatives; and impede or recommend the policy accordingly. Promotion of the best agendas are the product of careful back-room analysis of policies by a priori assessment and a posteriori evaluation.

Dimensions for analyzing policies[edit]
There are six dimensions to policy analysis categorized as the Effects and Implementation of the policy across a period of time. Also known as "Durability" of the policy, which means the capacity in content of the policy to produce visible effective compatible change or results over time with robustness.[6]

Effects

Effectiveness	What effects does the policy have on the targeted problem?
Unintended effects[7]	What are the unintended effects of this policy?
Equity[8]	What are the effects of this policy on different groups?
Implementation

Cost	What is the financial cost of this policy?
Feasibility	Is the policy technically feasible?
Acceptability[9]	Do the relevant policy stakeholders view the policy as acceptable?
The strategic Effects dimensions can pose certain limitations due to data collection. But the analytical dimensions of Effects directly influences Acceptability. The degree of Acceptability is based upon the plausible definitions of actors involved in Feasibility. If the Feasibility dimension is compromised, it will put the Implementation at risk, which will entail additional Cost. Finally Implementation dimensions collectively influence a policy's ability to produce results or impacts.

Five "E" approach[edit]
Effectiveness: How effective ?
Efficiency: How efficient ?
Ethical considerations: Ethically sound ?
Evaluations of alternatives: How good ?
Establishment of recommendations for positive change: What can be established ?
Evidence based Models[edit]
Many models exist to analyze the creation and application of public policy. Analysts use these models to identify important aspects of policy, as well as explain and predict policy and its consequences. Each of these models are based upon the types of policies.

Types of Policies[10][edit]
Government (e.g. federal, provincial, municipal)
Policies adopted within public institutions (e.g. hospital, child care centers, schools)
Workplace (e.g. policies that govern employees)
Some evidence supported models are:

For Governments[edit]
Public policy is determined by political institutions, which give policy legitimacy. Government universally applies policy to all citizens of society and monopolizes the use of force in applying policy. The legislature, executive and judicial branches of government are examples of institutions that give policy legitimacy.

Process model[edit]
See also: policy cycle
Policy creation is a process following these steps:

Identification of a problem and demand for government action.
Agenda setting
Formulation of policy proposals by various parties (e.g., congressional committees, think tanks, interest groups).
Policy selection/adoption and enactment of policy; this is known as Policy Legitimation.
Policy Implementation which has the plausible solution.
Policy Evaluation.
This model, however, has been criticized for being overly linear and simplistic.[11] In reality, stages of the policy process may overlap or never happen. Also, this model fails to take into account the multiple factors attempting to influence the process itself as well as each other, and the complexity this entails.

For Public Institutions[edit]
One of the most widely used model for Public Institutions are of Herbert A. Simon, the father of rational models. It is also used by private corporations. Though many criticise the model due to characteristics of the model being impractical and lying on unrealistic assumptions. For instance, it is a difficult model to apply in the public sector because social problems can be very complex, ill-defined and interdependent. The problem lies in the thinking procedure implied by the model which is linear and can face difficulties in extra ordinary problems or social problems which have no sequences of happenings.

Rational model[edit]
See Rational planning model for a fuller discussion

The rational model of decision-making is a process for making sound decisions in policy making in the public sector. Rationality is defined as “a style of behavior that is appropriate to the achievement of given goals, within the limits imposed by given conditions and constraints”.[12] It is important to note the model makes a series of work conditions, such as The model must be applied in a system that is stable; The government is a rational and unitary actor and that its actions are perceived as rational choices; The policy problem is unambiguous; There are no limitations of time or cost.

Furthermore, in the context of that public sector policy models are intended to achieve maximum social gain. Simon identifies an outline of a step by step mode of analysis to achieve rational decisions. Ian Thomas describes Simon's steps as follows:

Intelligence gathering — A comprehensive organization of data, potential problems and opportunities are identified, collected and analyzed.
Identifying problems — Accounting relevant factors.
Assessing the consequences of all options — Listing possible consequences and alternatives that could resolve the problem and ranking the probability that each potential factors could materialize in-order to give a correct priority in the analysis.
Relating consequences to values — With all policies there will be a set of relevant dimensional values (for example, economic feasibility and environmental protection) and a set of criteria for appropriateness, against which performance (or consequences) of each option being responsive can be judged.
Choosing the preferred option — The policy is brought through from fully understanding the problems, opportunities, all the consequences & the criteria of the tentative options and by selecting an optimal alternative with consensus of involved actors.[13]
The model of rational decision-making has also proven to be very useful to several decision making processes in industries outside the public sphere. Nonetheless, there are some who criticize the major problems faced when using the rational model arise in practice because social and environmental values can be difficult to quantify and forge consensus around.[14] Furthermore, the assumptions stated by Simon are never fully valid in a real world context.

Deficiencies of Rationalism — gap between planning and implementation. Ignores role of people, entrepreneurs, leadership, etc. Technical competence along is not enough (ignores the human factor). Too mechanical an approach, organizations are more organic. Models must be multidimensional and complex. Predictions are often wrong; simple solutions may be overlooked. The costs of rational-comprehensive planning may outweigh the cost savings of the policy.

However, Thomas R. Dye, the president of the Lincoln Center for Public Service states the rational model provides a good perspective since in modern society rationality plays a central role and everything that is rational tends to be prized. Thus, it does not seem strange that “we ought to be trying for rational decision-making”.[15]

Incremental Policy[edit]
See Incrementalism for a fuller discussion

This model relies on the concepts of incremental decision-making such as satisfying, organizational drift, bounded rationality, and limited cognition, among others. Basically can be called "muddling through." It represents a conservative tendency: new policies are only slightly different from old policies. Policy-makers are too short on time, resources and brains to make totally new policies; past policies are accepted as having some legitimacy. Existing policies have sunk costs which discourage innovation, incrementalism is an easier approach than rationalism, and the policies are more politically expedient because they don't necessitate any radical redistribution of values. This model tries to improve the acceptability of public policy.

Deficiencies of Incrementalism — Bargaining is not successful with limited resources. Can downplay useful quantitative information. Obscures real relationship being political shills. Anti-intellectual approach to problems; no imagination. Conservative; biased-against far-reaching solutions.

For Workplace[edit]
There are many contemporary policies relevant to gender and workplace issues. Actors analyze contemporary gender-related employment issues ranging from parental leave and maternity programs, sexual harassment, and work/life balance to gender mainstreaming. It is by the juxtaposition of a variety of research methodologies focused on a common theme the richness of understanding is gained. This integrates what are usually separate bodies of evaluation on the role of gender in welfare state developments, employment transformations, workplace policies, and work experience.

Group model[edit]
This policy is formed as a result of forces and pressures from influential groups. Pressure groups are informally co-opted into the policy making process. Regulatory agencies are captured by those they are supposed to regulate. No one group is dominant all the time on all issues. The group is the bridge between the individual and the administration. The executive is thus pressured by interest groups.

The task of the system is to

establish the rules of the game
arrange compromises and balance interests
enact compromises in policy
enforce these compromises
[icon]	This section requires expansion. (January 2015)
Other major types of Policy Analysis:-

a) Empirical, Normative Policy Analysis. b) Retrospective/Prospective Analysis. c) Prescriptive and Descriptive Analysis

Techniques used in Policy Analysis[edit]
[icon]	This section requires expansion. (January 2015)
Cost Benefit Analysis
Management by Objectives (MBO)
Operations Research
Decision making based on Analytics
Program Evaluation and Review Technique (PERT) & Critical path Method (CPM)
Evaluation[edit]
The success of a policy can be measured by changes in the behavior of the target population and active support from various actors and institutions involved. A public policy is an authoritative communication prescribing an unambiguous course of action for specified individuals or groups in certain situations. There must be an authority or leader charged with the implementation and monitoring of the policy with a sound social theory underlying the program and the target group. Evaluations can explain causal chains and what effects will be produced by program objectives/alternatives.

To obtain compliance of the actors involved, the government can resort to positive sanctions, such as favorable publicity, price supports, tax credits, grants-in-aid, direct services or benefits; declarations; rewards; voluntary standards; mediation; education; demonstration programs; training, contracts; subsidies; loans; general expenditures; informal procedures, bargaining; franchises; sole-source provider awards...etc.[16]

NCCHPP's 10 Steps for conducting a policy evaluation[edit]
Policy evaluation is used to examine content, implementation or impact of the policy, which helps to understand the merit, worth and the utility of the policy.[17]

Planning

Clarify the policy
Engage stakeholders
Assess resources and evaluability
Determine your evaluation questions
Determine methods and procedures
Develop evaluation plan
Implementation

Collect data
Process data and analyze results
Utilization

Interpret and disseminate the results
Apply evaluation findings

linkhttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Iron_triangle_(US_politics)

In United States politics, the iron triangle comprises the policy-making relationship among the congressional committees, the bureaucracy, and interest groups.[1]

Contents  [hide] 
1	Central assumption
2	Cultivation of a constituency
3	Dynamics of an iron triangle
4	See also
5	References
6	Bibliography
Central assumption[edit]
Central to the concept of an iron triangle is the assumption that bureaucratic agencies, as political entities, seek to create and consolidate their own power base. In this view an agency's power is determined by its constituency, not by its consumers. (For these purposes, "constituents" are politically active members sharing a common interest or goal; consumers are the expected recipients of goods or services provided by a governmental bureaucracy and are often identified in an agency's written goals or mission statement.)

Apparent bureaucratic dysfunction may be attributable to the alliances formed between the agency and its constituency. The official goals of an agency may appear to be thwarted or ignored altogether at the expense of the citizenry it is designed to serve.

Cultivation of a constituency[edit]
The need of a bureaucracy for a constituency sometimes leads to an agency's cultivation of a particular clientele. An agency may seek out those groups (within its policy jurisdiction) that will make the best allies and give it the most clout within the political arena.

Often, especially in a low-level bureaucracy, the consumers (the supposed beneficiaries of an agency's services) do not qualify as power brokers and thus make poor constituents. Large segments of the public have diffused interests, seldom vote, may be rarely or poorly organized and difficult to mobilize, and are often lacking in resources or financial muscle. Less-educated and poorer citizens, for example, typically make the worst constituents from an agency's perspective.

Private or special interest groups, on the other hand, possess considerable power as they tend to be well-organized, have plenty of resources, are easily mobilized, and are extremely active in political affairs, through voting, campaign contributions, and lobbying, as well as proposing legislation themselves.

Thus it may be in an agency's interest to switch its focus from its officially-designated consumers to a carefully selected clientele of constituents that will aid the agency in its quest for greater political influence.

Dynamics of an iron triangle[edit]
In the United States, power is exercised in the Congress, and particularly in congressional committees and subcommittees. By aligning itself with selected constituencies, an agency may be able to affect policy outcomes directly in these committees and subcommittees. This is where an iron triangle may manifest itself. The picture above displays the concept.

At one corner of the triangle are interest groups (constituencies). These are the powerful interests groups that influence Congressional votes in their favor and can sufficiently influence the re-election of a member of Congress in return for supporting their programs. At another corner sit members of Congress who also seek to align themselves with a constituency for political and electoral support. These congressional members support legislation that advances the interest group's agenda. Occupying the third corner of the triangle are bureaucrats, who are often pressured by the same powerful interest groups their agency is designated to regulate. The result is a three-way, stable alliance that is sometimes called a sub government because of its durability, impregnability, and power to determine policy.

An iron triangle can result in the passing of very narrow, pork-barrel policies that benefit a small segment of the population. The interests of the agency's constituency (the interest groups) are met, while the needs of consumers (which may be the general public) are passed over. That public administration may result in benefiting a small segment of the public in this way may be viewed as problematic for the popular concept of democracy if the general welfare of all citizens is sacrificed for very specific interests. This is especially so if the legislation passed neglects or reverses the original purpose for which the agency was established. Some maintain that such arrangements are consonant with (and are natural outgrowths of) the democratic process, since they frequently involve a majority block of voters implementing their will through their representatives in government.



linkwikigovofindia

----------https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vice_President_of_India
The Vice President of India is the second-highest constitutional office in India, after the President.[2] Article 63 of Indian Constitution states that there shall be a Vice-President of India. The Vice President shall act as President in the absence of the President due to death, resignation, impeachment, or other situations. The Vice President of India is also ex officio Chairperson of the Rajya Sabha.

Article 66 of the Indian Constitution states the manner of election of the Vice-President. The Vice-President is elected indirectly by members of an electoral college consisting of the members of both Houses of Parliament in accordance with the system of Proportional Representation by means of the Single transferable vote and the voting is by secret ballot.[3]

The current Vice President is Mohammad Hamid Ansari, since 11 August 2007, and re-elected on 7 August 2012 .
As in the case of the President, in order to be qualified to be elected as Vice President, a person must:

Have completed more than 35 years of age
Not hold any office of profit
While in order to be a President, a person must be qualified for election as a member of the Lok Sabha (House of Peoples), the Vice President must be qualified for election as a member of the Rajya Sabha (Council of States).[2] This difference is because the Vice President is to act as the ex officio Chairman of the Rajya Sabha.

The Vice President is elected indirectly, by an electoral college consisting of members of both houses of the Parliament. The election of the Vice President is slightly different from the election of the President as the members of state legislatures are not part of the electoral college for the Vice Presidential election.

The nomination of a candidate for election to the office of the Vice President must be subscribed by at least 20 electors as proposers and 20 electors as seconders. Every candidate has to make a security deposit of Rs.15,000 in the Reserve Bank of India.

The Election Commission of India, which is a constitutional autonomous body, conducts the election. The election is to be held no later than 60 days of the expiry of the term of office of the outgoing Vice President. A Returning Officer is appointed for the election, usually the Secretary-General of either House of the Parliament, by rotation. The Returning Officer issues a public notice of the intended election, inviting nomination of candidates. Any person qualified to be elected and intending to stand for election is required to be nominated by at least twenty Members of Parliament as proposers, and at least twenty other Members of Parliament as seconders. The nomination papers are scrutinized by the Returning Officer, and the names of all eligible candidates are added to the ballot.

The election is proportional representation by means of a single transferable vote by secret ballot. Voters stack-rank the candidates, assigning 1 to their first preference, 2 to their second preference, and so on. The number of votes required by a candidate to secure the election is calculated by dividing the total number of votes by two, and adding one to the quotient by disregarding any remainder. If no candidate obtains the required number of first-preference votes, the candidate with the least number of first-preference votes is eliminated and his/her second-preference votes are transferred. The process is repeated until a candidate obtains the requisite number of votes. Nominated members can also participate in the election.[4]

After the election has been held and the votes counted, the Returning Officer declares the result of the election to the electoral college. Thereafter, he/she reports the result to the Central Government (Ministry of Law & Justice) and the Election Commission of India and the Central Government publishes the name of the person elected as Vice President, in the Official Gazette.

The Vice-President may resign his office by submitting his resignation to the President. The resignation becomes effective from the day it is accepted.

All disputes arising in connection with the election of the Vice President are petitioned to the Supreme Court of India, which inquires into the matter. The petition is heard by a five-member bench of the Supreme Court, which decides on the matter. The decision of the Supreme Court is final.[4]

The article 69 of Indian Constitution provides the Oath of Affirmation for the Office of Vice President as under:-
"I, ________ do swear in the name of God/solemnly affirm that I will bear true faith and allegiance to solemnly affirm the Constitution of India as by law established and that I will faithfully discharge the duty upon which I am about to enter."
The President administers the oath of office and secrecy to the Vice-President.

The Vice President holds office for five years. He/she can be re-elected any number of times. However, the office may be terminated earlier by death, resignation or removal. The Constitution does not provide a mechanism of succession to the office of Vice President in the event of an extraordinary vacancy, apart from re-election. However, the Deputy Chairman of the Rajya Sabha can perform the duties of the Chairman of the Rajya Sabha in such an event.

The Vice President cannot be formally impeached, unlike the President. The Constitution states that the Vice President can be removed by a resolution of the Rajya Sabha passed by an effective majority (more than 50% of effective membership(total membership - Vacant seats)) and agreed to by a simple majority (50% of present and voting members) of the Lok Sabha (Article 67(b)).[2] But no such resolution may be moved unless at least 14 days' advance notice has been given. Notably, the Constitution does not list grounds for removal.

No Vice President or ex officio Vice President has ever faced removal proceedings.

There is no provision for the salary of the Vice President of India in that capacity. He/She gets the salary in his capacity as the ex officio Chairman of the Rajya Sabha (Council of States), which is currently Rs. 1,25,000 per month. In addition, he/she is entitled to daily allowance, free furnished residence, medical, travel and other facilities.[6] The constitution provides that when the ex officio Vice President acts as the President or discharges the duties of the President, he/she is entitled to the salary and privileges of the President.

The pension for the Vice-President is 50% of the salary.

----------https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Supreme_Court_of_India

The Supreme Court of India is the highest judicial forum and final court of appeal under the Constitution of India, the highest constitutional court, with the power of constitutional review.[1]

It comprises the Chief Justice of India and 30 other judges. It has original, appellate and advisory jurisdictions.

As the final court of appeal of the country, it takes up appeals primarily against verdicts of the High Courts of various States of the Union and other courts and tribunals.

The Supreme Court has extensive original jurisdiction for the protection of fundamental rights of citizens. It also acts as the court to settle disputes between various governments in the country. As an advisory court, it hears matters which may specifically be referred to it under the Constitution by the President of India. It also may take cognisance of matters on its own (or 'suo moto'), without anyone drawing its attention. It was first set up in Calcutta for administration of justice.

The law declared by the Supreme Court becomes binding on all courts within India.[2]
In 1861 the Indian High Courts Act 1861 was enacted to create High Courts for various provinces and abolished Supreme Courts at Calcutta, Madras and Bombay and also the Sadar Adalats in Presidency towns which had acted as the highest court in their respective regions. These new High Courts had the distinction of being the highest Courts for all cases till the creation of Federal Court of India under the Government of India Act 1935. The Federal Court had jurisdiction to solve disputes between provinces and federal states and hear appeal against judgements of the High Courts.[2]

The Supreme Court of India came into being on 28 January 1950.[3] It replaced both the Federal Court of India and the Judicial Committee of the Privy Council which were then at the apex of the Indian court system.[3]

Supreme Court initially had its seat at Chamber of Princes in the Parliament building where the previous Federal Court of India sat from 1937 to 1950. The first Chief Justice of India was Sir H J Kania. In 1958, the Supreme Court moved to its present premises.[3] Originally, Constitution of India envisaged a Supreme Court with a Chief Justice and seven Judges; leaving it to Parliament to increase this number.[4] In formative years, the Supreme Court met from 10 to 12 in the morning and then 2 to 4 in the afternoon for 28 days in a year.[2]

The building is shaped to symbolise scales of justice with its centre-beam being the Central Wing of the building comprising the Chief Justice’s court, the largest of the courtrooms, with two court halls on either side. The Right Wing of the structure has the bar - room, the offices of the Attorney General of India and other law officers and the library of the court. The Left Wing has the offices of the court. In all there are 15 court rooms in the various wings of the building.[2][3][5]

The foundation stone of the supreme court's building was laid on 29 October 1954 by Rajendra Prasad, the first President of India. The main block of the building has been built on a triangular plot of 17 acres and has been designed in an Indo-British style by the chief architect Ganesh Bhikaji Deolalikar, the first Indian to head the Central Public Works Department. The Court moved into the building in 1958. In 1979, two new wings - the East Wing and the West Wing - were added to the complex. 1994 saw the last extension.[3]

Mother and Child Sculpture

Supreme Court building with the sculpture in the foreground
On 20 February 1980, a black bronze sculpture of 210 centimeter height was installed in lawn of the Supreme Court. It portrays Mother India in the form of the figure of a lady, sheltering the young Republic of India represented by the symbol of a child, who is upholding the laws of land symbolically shown in the form of an open book. On the book, a balance is shown, which represents dispensation of equal justice to all. The sculpture was made by the renowned artist Chintamoni Kar[2]

Seal
The design of the Court's seal is reproduced from the wheel that appears on the abacus of the Sarnath Lion capital of Asoka with 24 spokes. The inscription in Sanskrit "yatodharmastato jayah" means "whence law (dharma), thence victory". It is also referred to - as the wheel of righteousness, encompassing truth, goodness and equity.[2]

Constitution of the court
Registry
The registry of the Supreme Court is headed by the Secretary-General who is assisted by 8 registrars, several additional and deputy registrars, etc., with 1770 employees in all (221 gazetted officers, 805 non-gazetted and 744 Class IV employees)[6] Article 146 of the Constitution deals with the appointments of officers and servants of the Supreme Court registry.[7][8]

Supreme Court advocates
Main article: Advocates-on-Record
Supreme Court Rules, 2013[9] entitle only those advocates who are registered with the supreme court, called 'Advocates-on-Record' to appear, act and plead for a party in the court. Those advocates who are designated as 'Senior Advocates' by the Supreme Court or any of the High Courts can appear for clients along with an Advocate-on-Record. Any other advocate can appear for a party along with or under instructions from an Advocate-on-Record.

Composition
Size of the court
As originally enacted, the Constitution of India provided for a Supreme Court with a Chief Justice and 7 judges. The current Chief Justice of India is Justice TS Thakur. In the early years, a full bench of the Supreme Court sat together to hear the cases presented before them. As the work of the Court increased and cases began to accumulate, Parliament increased the number of judges from the original 8 in 1950 to 11 in 1956, 14 in 1960, 18 in 1978, 26 in 1986 and 31 in 2008 (current strength). As the number of the judges has increased, they sit in smaller benches of two or three (referred to as a division bench) [10]— coming together in larger benches of five or more (referred to as a constitution bench) when required to settle fundamental questions of law. A bench may refer a case before it to a larger bench, should the need arise.[11]

Eligibility
A citizen of India[12] who has been

a judge of one high court or more (continuously), for at least five years,[12] or
an advocate there, for at least ten years,[12] or
a distinguished jurist,[12] in the opinion of the president,
is eligible to be recommended for appointment, a judge of the supreme court.

Court demographics
I am proud to be an Indian. India is the only country where a member of the minority Parsi community with a population of 1,67,000, like myself, can aspire to attain the post of the Chief Justice of India. These things do not happen in our neighbouring countries.

Former Chief Justice of India, S. H. Kapadia[13][14]
In practice, judges of the supreme court have been selected so far, mostly from amongst judges of the high courts. Barely six - Justices S. M. Sikri, S. Chandra Roy, Kuldip Singh, Santosh Hegde, R. F. Nariman and U. U. Lalit have been appointed to the supreme court directly from the bar (i.e. who were practising advocates).[15][16]

The supreme court saw its first woman judge when Justice M. Fathima Beevi was sworn into office in 1989.[17] The sixth and the most recent woman judge in the court is Justice R. Banumathi.[18][19] In 2000 Justice K. G. Balakrishnan became the first judge from the dalit community. In 2007 he also became the first dalit Chief Justice of India. In 2010, Justice S. H. Kapadia coming from a Parsi minority community became the Chief Justice of India.[13][20]

Judicial independence
The Constitution seeks to ensure the independence of Supreme Court Judges in various ways.

Appointments and the Collegium
As per the Constitution, as held by the court in the Three Judges' Cases - (1982, 1993, 1998), a judge is appointed to the Supreme Court by the President of India on the recommendation of the collegium  — a closed group of the Chief Justice of India, the four most senior judges of the court and the senior-most judge hailing from the high court of a prospective appointee.[21] This has resulted in a Memorandum of Procedure being followed, for the appointments.

Judges used to be appointed by him on the advice of the Union Cabinet. After 1993 (the Second Judges' Case), no minister, or even the executive collectively, can suggest any names to the President,[22][23] who ultimately decides on appointing them from a list of names recommended only by the collegium of the judiciary. Simultaneously, as held in that judgment, the executive was given the power to reject a recommended name. However, according to some, the executive has not been diligent in using this power to reject the names of bad candidates recommended by the judiciary.[24][25][26]

The collegium system has come under a fair amount of criticism.[23] One recommendation by a collegium came to be challenged in court. The court held that who could become a judge was a matter of fact, and any person had a right to question it. But who should become a judge was a matter of opinion and could not be questioned. As long as an effective consultation took place within a collegium in arriving at that opinion, the ,[27] the court has invited everyone,[28] including the public,[29][30] to suggest by mid-November 2015,[31] how to improve it, broadly along the lines of - setting up an eligibility criteria for appointments, a permanent secretariat to help the collegium sift through material on potential candidates, infusing more transparency into the selection process, grievance redressal and any other suggestion not in these four categories, like transfer of judges.[32]

The position of Chief Justice of India is attained on the basis of seniority amongst the judges serving on the court.[11]

Tenure
Supreme Court judges retire at the age of 65 which is 3 years more than the retirement age of a judge of the High Court. Hence a judge at the Supreme Court who have been elevated from a High Court serves at the Supreme Court for at least more than 3 years. However, there have been suggestions, including from the judges of the Supreme Court of India, to provide for a fixed term for the judges there including the Chief Justice of India.[33]

Salary
Article 125 of the Indian Constitution leaves it to the Indian Parliament to determine the salary, other allowances, leave of absence, pension, etc. of the Supreme Court judges. However, the Parliament cannot alter any of these privileges and rights to the judge's disadvantage after his appointment.[34] A judge gets ₹90,000 per month, the Chief Justice earns an additional ₹10,000.[35]

Removal
A judge of the Supreme Court can be removed under the Constitution only on grounds of proven misconduct or incapacity and by an order of the President of India, after a notice signed by at least 100 members of the Lok Sabha (House of the People) or 50 members of the Rajya Sabha (Council of the States) is passed by a two-third majority in each House of the Parliament.[36][37]

Post-retirement
A person who has retired as a Judge of the Supreme Court is debarred from practising in any court of law or before any other authority in India.

Power to review its own judgements
Further information: Review petition
Article 137 of the Constitution of India lays down provision for power of the Supreme Court to review its own judgments. As per this Article, subject to the provisions of any law made by Parliament or any rules made under Article 145, the Supreme Court shall have power to review any judgment pronounced or order made by it.[38]

Under Order XL of the Supreme Court Rules, that have been framed under its powers under Article 145 of the Constitution, the Supreme Court may review its judgment or order but no application for review is to be entertained in a civil proceeding except on the grounds mentioned in Order XLVII, Rule 1 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

Powers to punish for contempt
Under Articles 129 and 142 of the Constitution the Supreme Court has been vested with power to punish anyone for contempt of any court in India including itself. The Supreme Court performed an unprecedented action when it directed a sitting Minister of the state of Maharashtra, Swaroop Singh Naik,[39] to be jailed for 1-month on a charge of contempt of court on 12 May 2006. This was the first time that a serving Minister was ever jailed.[40][41]

Rules
The Constitution of India under Article 145 empowers the Supreme Court to frame its own rules for regulating the practice and procedure of the Court as and when required (with the approval of the President of India). Accordingly, "Supreme Court Rules, 1950" were framed. The 1950 Rules were replaced by the Supreme Court Rules, 1966.

[42] In 2014, Supreme Court notified the Supreme Court Rules, 2013 replacing the 1966 Rules effective from 19 August 2014.[9]

Reporting and citation
Supreme Court Reports is the official journal of Reportable Supreme Court Decisions. It is published under the authority of the Supreme Court of India by the Controller of Publications, Government of India, Delhi.[43] In addition, there are many other reputed private journals that report Supreme Court decisions. Some of these other important journals are: SCR (The Supreme Court Reports), SCC(Supreme Court Cases), AIR (All India Reporter), SCALE, etc.

Facilities on the campus
Legal-aid,[44][45][46] court-fee vendors, first-aid post, dental clinic, physiotherapy unit and pathology lab; rail-reservation counter, canteen, post office and a branch and an ATM of UCO Bank, Supreme Court Museum[6] can be availed by litigants and visitors.

Landmark judgments
Land reform
After some of the courts overturned state laws for redistributing land from zamindar (landlord) estates on the ground that the laws violated the zamindars' fundamental rights, the Parliament passed the 1st amendment to the Constitution in 1951, followed by the 4th amendment in 1955, to uphold its authority to redistribute land. The Supreme Court countered these amendments in 1967 when it ruled in Golaknath v. State of Punjab[47] that the Parliament did not have the power to abrogate fundamental rights, including the provisions on private property. The 25th amendment to the Constitution in 1971 curtailed the right of a citizen to property as a fundamental right and gave authority to the government to infringe private property, which led to a furore amongst the zamindars.

Emergency (1975-1977)
The independence of judiciary was severely curtailed[48] during the Indian Emergency (1975-1977) of Indira Gandhi. The constitutional rights of imprisoned persons were restricted under Preventive detention laws passed by the parliament. In the case of Shiva Kant Shukla Additional District Magistrate of Jabalpur v. Shiv Kant Shukla, popularly known as the Habeas Corpus case, a bench of five seniormost judges of Supreme court ruled in favour of state's right for unrestricted powers of detention during emergency. Justices A.N. Ray, P. N. Bhagwati, Y. V. Chandrachud, and M.H. Beg, stated in the majority decision:[49]

(under the declaration of emergency) no person has any locus to move any writ petition under Art. 226 before a High Court for habeas corpus or any other writ or order or direction to challenge the legality of an order of detention.
The only dissenting opinion was from Justice H. R. Khanna, who stated:

detention without trial is an anathema to all those who love personal liberty... A dissent is an appeal to the brooding spirit of the law, to the intelligence of a future day, when a later decision may possibly correct the error into which the dissenting Judge believes the court to have been betrayed.[49]
It is believed that before delivering his dissenting opinion, Justice Khanna had mentioned to his sister: "I have prepared my judgment, which is going to cost me the Chief Justice-ship of India."[50] In January 1977, Justice Khanna was superseded despite being the most senior judge at the time and thereby Government broke the convention of appointing only the senior most judge to the position of Chief Justice of India. Justice Khanna remains a legendary figure among the legal fraternity in India for this decision.

The New York Times, wrote of this opinion: "The submission of an independent judiciary to absolutist government is virtually the last step in the destruction of a democratic society; and the Indian Supreme Court's decision appears close to utter surrender."

During the emergency period, the government also passed the 39th amendment, which sought to limit judicial review for the election of the Prime Minister; only a body constituted by Parliament could review this election.[51] Subsequently, the parliament, with most opposition members in jail during the emergency, passed the 42nd Amendment which prevented any court from reviewing any amendment to the constitution with the exception of procedural issues concerning ratification. A few years after the emergency, however, the Supreme court rejected the absoluteness of the 42nd amendment and reaffirmed its power of judicial review in the Minerva Mills case (1980).

Post-1980: an assertive court
See also: Judicial Activism In India
After Indira Gandhi lost elections in 1977, the new government of Morarji Desai, and especially law minister Shanti Bhushan (who had earlier argued for the detenues in the Habeas Corpus case), introduced a number of amendments making it more difficult to declare and sustain an emergency, and reinstated much of the power to the Supreme Court. It is said that the Basic Structure doctrine, created in Kesavananda Bharati v. State of Kerala, was strengthened in Indira Gandhi's case and set in stone in [Minerva Mills v. Union of India].[52]

The Supreme Court's creative and expansive interpretations of Article 21 (Life and Personal Liberty), primarily after the Emergency period, have given rise to a new jurisprudence of public interest litigation that has vigorously promoted many important economic and social rights (constitutionally protected but not enforceable) including, but not restricted to, the rights to free education, livelihood, a clean environment,[53] food and many others. Civil and political rights (traditionally protected in the Fundamental Rights chapter of the Indian Constitution) have also been expanded and more fiercely protected. These new interpretations have opened the avenue for litigation on a number of important issues.

Recent important cases
Among the important pronouncements of the Supreme Court post 2000 is the Coelho case [I.R. Coelho v. State of Tamil Nadu (Judgment of 11 January 2007)]. A unanimous Bench of 9 judges reaffirmed the basic structure doctrine. It held that a constitutional amendment which entails violation of any fundamental rights which the Court regards as forming part of the basic structure of the Constitution, then the same can be struck down depending upon its impact and consequences. The judgment clearly imposes further limitations on the constituent power of Parliament with respect to the principles underlying certain fundamental rights. The judgment in Coelho has in effect restored the decision in Golak Nath regarding non-amendability of the Constitution on account of infraction of fundamental rights, contrary to the judgment in the Kesavananda Bharati case.

Another important decision was of the five-judge Bench in Ashoka Kumara Thakur v. Union of India; where the constitutional validity of Central Educational Institutions (Reservations in Admissions) Act, 2006 was upheld, subject to the "creamy layer" criteria. Importantly, the Court refused to follow the 'strict scrutiny' standards of review followed by the United States Supreme Court. At the same time, the Court has applied the strict scrutiny standards in Anuj Garg v. Hotel Association of India (2007) ([1])

2G spectrum scam
Further information: 2G spectrum scam
The Supreme Court declared allotment of spectrum as "unconstitutional and arbitrary" and quashed all the 122 licenses issued in 2008 during tenure of A. Raja (then minister for communications & IT), the main official accused in the 2G scam case.[54]

Black money
Further information: Indian black money
The government refused to disclose details of about 18 Indians holding accounts in LGT Bank, Liechtenstein, evoking a sharp response from a Bench comprising Justices B Sudershan Reddy and S S Nijjar. The court ordered Special investigation team (SIT) to probe the matter.[55][56] Lack of enthusiasm made the court create a special investigative team (SIT).[57]

Minority reservations
The SC refused to stay the Andhra High Court judgement quashing 4.5% sub-quota for minorities under OBC reservation quota of 27%.[58]

Online/Postal Ballot For Indians Citizens Living Abroad (NRIs)
Three judge bench presided by Honorable Chief Justice Altamas Kabir issued notice to the Centre and the Election Commission of India (EC) on the PIL filed by a group of NRIs for online/postal ballot for the Indian citizens living in abroad.[59][60]

Recognition of transgender as 'third gender' in law
Main article: National Legal Services Authority v. Union of India
In April 2014, Justice KS Radhakrishnan declared transgender to be the 'third gender' in Indian law, in a case brought by the National Legal Services Authority (Nalsa) against Union of India and others.[61][62][63] The ruling said:[64]

Seldom, our society realises or cares to realise the trauma, agony and pain which the members of Transgender community undergo, nor appreciates the innate feelings of the members of the Transgender community, especially of those whose mind and body disown their biological sex. Our society often ridicules and abuses the Transgender community and in public places like railway stations, bus stands, schools, workplaces, malls, theatres, hospitals, they are sidelined and treated as untouchables, forgetting the fact that the moral failure lies in the society's unwillingness to contain or embrace different gender identities and expressions, a mindset which we have to change.

Justice Radhakrishnan said that transgender people should be treated consistently with other minorities under the law, enabling them to access jobs, healthcare and education.[65] He framed the issue as one of human rights, saying that, "These TGs, even though insignificant in numbers, are still human beings and therefore they have every right to enjoy their human rights", concluding by declaring that:[64]

(1) Hijras, eunuchs, apart from binary gender, be treated as "third gender" for the purpose of safeguarding their rights under Part III of our Constitution and the laws made by the Parliament and the State Legislature.

(2) Transgender persons' right to decide their self-identified gender is also upheld and the Centre and State Governments are directed to grant legal recognition of their gender identity such as male, female or as third gender.

Relief to over 35,000 public servants
In B.Prabhakara Rao vs. State of A.P. involved sudden reduction in age of superannuation from 58 years to 55 years of over 35,000 public servants of State Government, public sector undertakings, statutory bodies, educational institutions and Tirupathi-Tirumalai Devasthanams (TTD). They lost first round of litigation in the Supreme Court. Realising the mistake, fresh legislation was brought restoring the original age of superannuation of 58 years but providing that the benefit of new legislation would not extend to those whose reduction of age of superannuation had been upheld. In challenge to this law, Subodh Markandeya argued that all that was required was to strike down naughty “not” – which found favour with the Supreme Court bringing relief to over 35,000 public servants.[66][67]

Criticism
Corruption and misconduct of judges
2008 saw the Supreme Court embroiled in several controversies, from serious allegations of corruption at the highest level of the judiciary,[68] expensive private holidays at the tax payers expense,[69] refusal to divulge details of judges' assets to the public,[70] secrecy in the appointments of judges',[71] to refusal to make information public under the Right to Information Act.[72] The Chief Justice K. G. Balakrishnan invited a lot of criticism for his comments on his post not being that of a public servant, but that of a constitutional authority.[73] He later went back on this stand.[74] The judiciary has come in for serious criticisms from former Presidents of India Pratibha Patil and A. P. J. Abdul Kalam for failure in handling its duties.[75] Former Prime Minister Manmohan Singh, has stated that corruption is one of the major challenges facing the judiciary, and suggested that there is an urgent need to eradicate this menace.[76]

The Cabinet Secretary of the Indian government introduced the Judges Inquiry (Amendment) Bill 2008 in Parliament for setting up of a panel called the National Judicial Council, headed by the Chief Justice of India, that will probe into allegations of corruption and misconduct by High Court and Supreme Court judges.[77][78]

Pendency of cases
According to Supreme Court newsletter, there are 58,519 cases pending in the Supreme Court, out of which 37,385 are pending for more than a year, at the end of 2011. Excluding connected cases, there are still 33,892 pending cases.[79] As per the latest pendency data made available by the Supreme Court, the total number of pending cases in the Supreme Court as on 1 April 2014 is 64,330, which includes 34,144 Admission matters (miscellaneous) and 30,186 Regular Hearing matters.[80] Recently, in May, 2014, former Chief Justice of India, Justice R.M. Lodha, proposed to make Indian judiciary work throughout the year (instead of the present system of having long vacations, specially in the higher courts) in order to reduce pendency of cases in Indian courts; however, as per this proposal there is not going to be any increase in the number of working days or working hours of any of the judges and it only meant that different judges would be going on vacation during different periods of the year as per their choice; but, the Bar Council of India rejected this proposal mainly because it would have inconvenienced the advocates who would have to work throughout the year.[81]

The Vice President of India is the second-highest constitutional office in India, after the President.[2] Article 63 of Indian Constitution states that there shall be a Vice-President of India. The Vice President shall act as President in the absence of the President due to death, resignation, impeachment, or other situations. The Vice President of India is also ex officio Chairperson of the Rajya Sabha.

Article 66 of the Indian Constitution states the manner of election of the Vice-President. The Vice-President is elected indirectly by members of an electoral college consisting of the members of both Houses of Parliament in accordance with the system of Proportional Representation by means of the Single transferable vote and the voting is by secret ballot.[3]

The current Vice President is Mohammad Hamid Ansari, since 11 August 2007, and re-elected on 7 August 2012 .

As in the case of the President, in order to be qualified to be elected as Vice President, a person must:

Have completed more than 35 years of age
Not hold any office of profit
While in order to be a President, a person must be qualified for election as a member of the Lok Sabha (House of Peoples), the Vice President must be qualified for election as a member of the Rajya Sabha (Council of States).[2] This difference is because the Vice President is to act as the ex officio Chairman of the Rajya Sabha.

Election
The Vice President is elected indirectly, by an electoral college consisting of members of both houses of the Parliament. The election of the Vice President is slightly different from the election of the President as the members of state legislatures are not part of the electoral college for the Vice Presidential election.

The nomination of a candidate for election to the office of the Vice President must be subscribed by at least 20 electors as proposers and 20 electors as seconders. Every candidate has to make a security deposit of Rs.15,000 in the Reserve Bank of India.

The Election Commission of India, which is a constitutional autonomous body, conducts the election. The election is to be held no later than 60 days of the expiry of the term of office of the outgoing Vice President. A Returning Officer is appointed for the election, usually the Secretary-General of either House of the Parliament, by rotation. The Returning Officer issues a public notice of the intended election, inviting nomination of candidates. Any person qualified to be elected and intending to stand for election is required to be nominated by at least twenty Members of Parliament as proposers, and at least twenty other Members of Parliament as seconders. The nomination papers are scrutinized by the Returning Officer, and the names of all eligible candidates are added to the ballot.

The election is proportional representation by means of a single transferable vote by secret ballot. Voters stack-rank the candidates, assigning 1 to their first preference, 2 to their second preference, and so on. The number of votes required by a candidate to secure the election is calculated by dividing the total number of votes by two, and adding one to the quotient by disregarding any remainder. If no candidate obtains the required number of first-preference votes, the candidate with the least number of first-preference votes is eliminated and his/her second-preference votes are transferred. The process is repeated until a candidate obtains the requisite number of votes. Nominated members can also participate in the election.[4]

After the election has been held and the votes counted, the Returning Officer declares the result of the election to the electoral college. Thereafter, he/she reports the result to the Central Government (Ministry of Law & Justice) and the Election Commission of India and the Central Government publishes the name of the person elected as Vice President, in the Official Gazette.

The Vice-President may resign his office by submitting his resignation to the President. The resignation becomes effective from the day it is accepted.

Election disputes
All disputes arising in connection with the election of the Vice President are petitioned to the Supreme Court of India, which inquires into the matter. The petition is heard by a five-member bench of the Supreme Court, which decides on the matter. The decision of the Supreme Court is final.[4]

Oath of Affirmation
The article 69 of Indian Constitution provides the Oath of Affirmation for the Office of Vice President as under:-
"I, ________ do swear in the name of God/solemnly affirm that I will bear true faith and allegiance to solemnly affirm the Constitution of India as by law established and that I will faithfully discharge the duty upon which I am about to enter."
The President administers the oath of office and secrecy to the Vice-President.

Term
The Vice President holds office for five years. He/she can be re-elected any number of times. However, the office may be terminated earlier by death, resignation or removal. The Constitution does not provide a mechanism of succession to the office of Vice President in the event of an extraordinary vacancy, apart from re-election. However, the Deputy Chairman of the Rajya Sabha can perform the duties of the Chairman of the Rajya Sabha in such an event.

Removal
The Vice President cannot be formally impeached, unlike the President. The Constitution states that the Vice President can be removed by a resolution of the Rajya Sabha passed by an effective majority (more than 50% of effective membership(total membership - Vacant seats)) and agreed to by a simple majority (50% of present and voting members) of the Lok Sabha (Article 67(b)).[2] But no such resolution may be moved unless at least 14 days' advance notice has been given. Notably, the Constitution does not list grounds for removal.

No Vice President or ex officio Vice President has ever faced removal proceedings.[5]

Salary and pension
There is no provision for the salary of the Vice President of India in that capacity. He/She gets the salary in his capacity as the ex officio Chairman of the Rajya Sabha (Council of States), which is currently Rs. 1,25,000 per month. In addition, he/she is entitled to daily allowance, free furnished residence, medical, travel and other facilities.[6] The constitution provides that when the ex officio Vice President acts as the President or discharges the duties of the President, he/she is entitled to the salary and privileges of the President.

The pension for the Vice-President is 50% of the salary.[7]

 The Constitution of India is the supreme law of India. It is a living document, the permanent instrument which makes the government system work.[1] It lays down the framework defining fundamental political principles, establishes the structure, procedures, powers and duties of government institutions and sets out fundamental rights, directive principles and the duties of citizens. It is the longest written constitution of any sovereign country in the world. The nation is governed on the basis of this Constitution.[Note 1][2] Dr. Bhimrao Ramji Ambedkar is regarded as the chief architect of the Indian Constitution, but it was the Constituent Assembly that worked under Dr Ambedkar and his team that drafted the final copy of the Indian Constitution


Jawaharlal Nehru signing the Constitution
The constitution of India imparts constitutional supremacy and not parliamentary supremacy as it is not created by the Parliament but created by a constituent assembly and adopted by its people with a declaration in the preamble to the constitution.[3] Parliament cannot override the constitution.

The Constitution was adopted by the Constituent Assembly on 26 November 1949, and came into effect on 26 January 1950.[4] The date of 26 January was chosen to commemorate the Purna Swaraj declaration of independence of 1930. With its adoption, the Union of India officially became the modern and contemporary Republic of India and it replaced the Government of India Act 1935 as the country's fundamental governing document. To ensure constitutional autochthony, the framers of constitution repealed the prior Acts of the British Parliament via the Article 395 of the constitution.[5] India celebrates the coming into force of the constitution on 26 January each year as Republic Day.[6]

The Constitution declares India a sovereign, socialist, secular,[7] democratic republic, assuring its citizens of justice, equality, and liberty, and endeavors to promote fraternity among them.[8]

 

Dr. Ambedkar is hailed as the prime architect of the Indian Constitution
The major portion of the Indian subcontinent was under British rule from 1857 to 1947. When the Constitution of India came into force on 26 January 1950, it repealed the Indian Independence Act. India ceased to be a dominion of the British Crown and became a sovereign democratic republic.

Articles 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 60, 324, 366, 367, 379, 380, 388, 391, 392, 393 and 394 came into force on 26 Nov 1949 and remaining articles on 26 Jan 1950.[9]

Previous legislation used as sources
The Constitution of India is drawn from many sources. Keeping in mind the needs and conditions of India the framers of the Constitution of India borrowed different features freely from previous legislation viz. Government of India Act 1858, Indian Councils Act 1861, Indian Councils Act 1892, Indian Councils Act 1909, Government of India Act 1919, Government of India Act 1935 and the Indian Independence Act 1947. The last legislation which led to the creation of the two independent nations of India and Pakistan provided for the division of the erstwhile Constituent Assembly into two, with each new assembly having sovereign powers transferred to it, to enable each to draft and enact a new constitution, for the separate states.

Constituent assembly
Main article: Constituent Assembly of India
The Constitution was drafted by the Constituent Assembly, which was elected by the elected members of the provincial assemblies.[10] The 389 member Constituent Assembly took almost three years (two years, eleven months and eighteen days to be precise) to complete its historic task of drafting the Constitution for Independent India. During this period, it held eleven sessions covering a total of 165 days. Of these, 114 days were spent on the consideration of the Draft Constitution. On 29 August 1947, the Constituent Assembly set up a Drafting Committee under the Chairmanship of Dr. B.R. Ambedkar to prepare a Draft Constitution for India. While deliberating upon the draft Constitution, the Assembly moved, discussed and disposed of as many as 2,473 amendments out of a total of 7,635 tabled.[11] Dr B.R. Ambedkar, Sanjay Phakey, Jawaharlal Nehru, C. Rajagopalachari, Rajendra Prasad, Sardar Vallabhbhai Patel, Kanaiyalal Munshi, Ganesh Vasudev Mavalankar, Sandipkumar Patel, Maulana Abul Kalam Azad, Shyama Prasad Mukherjee, Nalini Ranjan Ghosh, and Balwantrai Mehta were some important figures in the Assembly. There were more than 30 members of the scheduled classes. Frank Anthony represented the Anglo-Indian community, and the Parsis were represented by H. P. Modi. The Chairman of the Minorities Committee was Harendra Coomar Mookerjee, a distinguished Christian who represented all Christians other than Anglo-Indians. Ari Bahadur Gururng represented the Gorkha Community. Prominent jurists like Alladi Krishnaswamy Iyer, Benegal Narsing Rau and K. M. Munshi, Ganesh Mavlankar were also members of the Assembly. Sarojini Naidu, Hansa Mehta, Durgabai Deshmukh, Rajkumari Amrit Kaur and Vijayalakshmi Pandit were important women members.

The first temporary 2-day president of the Constituent Assembly was Dr Sachchidananda Sinha. Later, Rajendra Prasad was elected president of the Constituent Assembly.[10] The members of the Constituent Assembly met for the first time on 9 December 1946.[10]

Drafting
On the 14 August 1947 meeting of the Assembly, a proposal for forming various committees was presented.[10] Such committees included a Committee on Fundamental Rights, the Union Powers Committee and Union Constitution Committee. On 29 August 1947, the Drafting Committee was appointed, with Dr B. R. Ambedkar as the Chairman along with six other members assisted by a constitutional advisor. These members were Pandit Govind Ballabh Pant, Kanaiyalal Maneklal Munshi (K M Munshi, Ex- Home Minister, Bombay), Alladi Krishnaswamy Iyer (Ex- Advocate General, Madras State), N Gopalaswami Ayengar (Ex-Prime Minister, J&K and later member of Nehru Cabinet), B L Mitter (Ex-Advocate General, India), Md. Saadullah (Ex- Chief Minister of Assam, Muslim League member) and D P Khaitan (Scion of Khaitan Business family and a renowned lawyer). The constitutional advisor was Sir Benegal Narsing Rau (who became First Indian Judge in International Court of Justice, 1950–54). Later B L Mitter resigned and was replaced by Madhav Rao (Legal Advisor of Maharaja of Vadodara). Owing to death of D P Khaitan, T T Krishnamachari was chosen to be included in the drafting committee. A Draft Constitution was prepared by the committee and submitted to the Assembly on 4 November 1947. Draft constitution was debated and over 2000 amendments were moved over a period of two years. Finally on 26 November 1949, the process was completed and Constituent assembly adopted the constitution. 284 members signed the document and the process of constitution making was complete.[12] This day is celebrated as National Law Day[13] or Constitution Day.[14]

The Assembly met in sessions open to the public, for 166 days, spread over a period of 2 years, 11 months and 18 days before adopting the Constitution, the 308 members of the Assembly signed two copies of the document (one each in Hindi and English) on 24 January 1950. The original Constitution of India is hand-written with beautiful calligraphy, each page beautified and decorated by artists from Shantiniketan including Beohar Rammanohar Sinha and Nandalal Bose. Two days later, on 26 January 1950, the Constitution of India became the law of all the States and territories of India.[15] Rs.1,00,00,000 was official estimate of expenditure on constituent assembly. The Constitution has undergone many amendments since its enactment.[16]

Influence of other constitutions
British Constitution

Parliamentary form of government
The idea of single citizenship
The idea of the Rule of law
Institution of Speaker and his role
Lawmaking procedure
Procedure established by Law
United States Constitution

Charter of Fundamental Rights
Federal structure of government
Electoral College
Independence of the judiciary and separation of powers among the three branches of the government
Judicial review
President as supreme commander of
armed forces
Equal Protection under law
Irish Constitution

Directive principles of state policy
Australian Constitution

Freedom of trade and commerce within
the country and between the states
Power of the national legislature to make
laws for implementing treaties, even on
matters outside normal Federal jurisdiction
Concurrent List[17]
Terminology for the Preamble
French Constitution

Ideals of Liberty, Equality and Fraternity
Canadian Constitution

A quasi-federal form of government —
a federal system with a strong central government
Distribution of powers between the central government and state governments
Residual powers retained by the central government[18][19]
Constitution of the Soviet Union

Fundamental Duties u/a 51-A
A Constitutionally mandated Planning Commission
to oversee the development of the economy
Other Constitutions

Emergency Provision u/a 356, Weimar Constitution (Germany)
Amendment of Constitution, South Africa
Due Procedure of Law, Japan
Structure
The Indian constitution is the world's longest constitution.[Note 1] At the time of commencement, the constitution had 395 articles in 22 parts and 8 schedules. It consists of almost 80,000 words. The Constitution, in its current form (September 2012), consists of a preamble, 25[Note 2] parts containing 448[20][Note 3] articles, 12[Note 4] schedules, 5 appendices[21] and 100 amendments, the latest of which came into force on 1 August 2015.[22]

Parts
The individual Articles of the Constitution are grouped together into the following Parts:

Preamble[23]
with the words "socialist" and "secular" added to it in 1976 by the 42nd constitutional amendment (mini constitution).[24][25]

Part I[26] – Union and its Territory
Part II[27] – Citizenship.
Part III – Fundamental Rights
Part IV[28] – Directive Principles of State Policy
Part IVA – Fundamental Duties
Part V[29] – The Union
Part VI[30] – The States
Part VII[31] – States in the B part of the First schedule (repealed)
Part VIII[32] – The Union Territories
Part IX[33] – The Panchayats
Part IXA[34] – The Municipalities
Part IXB – The Co-operative Societies.[35]
Part X – The scheduled and Tribal Areas
Part XI – Relations between the Union and the States
Part XII – Finance, Property, Contracts and Suits
Part XIII – Trade and Commerce within the territory of India
Part XIV – Services Under the Union, the States
Part XIVA – Tribunals
Part XV – Elections
Part XVI – Special Provisions Relating to certain Classes
Part XVII – Languages
Part XVIII – Emergency Provisions
Part XIX – Miscellaneous
Part XX – Amendment of the Constitution
Part XXI – Temporary, Transitional and Special Provisions
Part XXII – Short title, date of commencement, Authoritative text in Hindi and Repeals.
Schedules
Schedules are lists in the Constitution that categorize and tabulate bureaucratic activity and policy of the Government.

First Schedule (Articles 1 and 4) - This lists the states and territories of India, lists any changes to their borders and the laws used to make that change.
Second Schedule (Articles 59(3), 65(3), 75(6), 97, 125, 148(3), 158(3), 164(5), 186 and 221)- – This lists the salaries of officials holding public office, judges, and Comptroller and Auditor General of India.
Third Schedule (Articles 75(4), 99, 124(6), 148(2), 164(3), 188 and 219)—Forms of Oaths – This lists the oaths of offices for elected officials and judges.
Fourth Schedule (Articles 4(1) and 80(2)) – This details the allocation of seats in the Rajya Sabha (the upper house of Parliament) per State or Union Territory.
Fifth Schedule (Article 244(1)) – This provides for the administration and control of Scheduled Areas[Note 5] and Scheduled Tribes[Note 6] (areas and tribes needing special protection due to disadvantageous conditions).
Sixth Schedule (Articles 244(2) and 275(1))— Provisions made for the administration of tribal areas in Assam, Meghalaya, Tripura, and Mizoram.
Seventh Schedule (Article 246) —The union (central government), state, and concurrent lists of responsibilities.
Eighth Schedule (Articles 344(1) and 351)—The official languages.
Ninth Schedule (Article 31-B) – Validation of certain Acts and Regulations.[36]
Tenth Schedule (Articles 102(2) and 191(2))—"Anti-defection" provisions for Members of Parliament and Members of the State Legislatures.
Eleventh Schedule (Article 243-D) —Panchayat Raj (rural local government),
Twelfth Schedule (Article 243-W) — Municipalities (urban local government).
Appendices
Appendix I—The Constitution (Application to Jammu and Kashmir) Order, 1954.
Appendix II— Re-statement, with reference to the present text of the Constitution, of the exceptions and modifications subject to which the Constitution applies to the State of Jammu and Kashmir.
Appendix III—Extracts from the Constitution (Forty-fourth Amendment) Act, 1978.
Appendix IV—The Constitution (Eighty-sixth Amendment) Act, 2002.
Appendix V— The Constitution (Eighty-eighth Amendment) Act, 2003.
The constitution and the government
Institutions of governance, such as the Parliament, the President, the Judiciary, the Executive, etc. did not exist before the adoption of the constitution, by the people of India, and were created by it.[37][dubious – discuss] With the aid of the Constitution, India is governed by a parliamentary system of government with the executive directly accountable to the legislature. It states that there shall be a President of India who shall be the head of the executive, under Articles 52 and 53. The President's duty is to preserve, protect and defend the constitution and the law under Article 60 of the Indian constitution. Article 74 provides that there shall be a Prime Minister as the head of union cabinet which would aid and advice the President in performing his constitutional duty. Union cabinet is collectively responsible to the House of the People as per Article 75(3).

The Constitution of India is federal in nature but unitary in spirit. The common features of a federation such as written Constitution, supremacy of Constitution, rigidity of Constitution, two government, division of powers, bicameralism and independent judiciary as well as unitary features like single Constitution, single citizenship, integrated judiciary, flexible Constitution, a strong Centre, appointment of state governor by the Centre, All-India Services, Emergency Provisions etc. can be seen in Indian Constitution. This unique combination makes it quasi-federal in form.[38]

Each state and each Union territory of India has its own government. Analogous to President and Prime Minister, each has a Governor (in case of states) or Lieutenant Governor (in the case of Union territories) and a Chief Minister. Article 356 permits the President to dismiss a state government when a situation has arisen in which the Government of the State cannot be carried on in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution. This power was abused earlier as state governments came to be dismissed on the flimsiest of grounds, and more due to the political discomfiture of the party in power at the centre. Post - Bommai judgment,[39][40] such a course of action has been rendered rather difficult, as the courts have asserted their right to review it.[41] Consequently, very few state governments have been disbanded since.

The 73rd and 74th Amendment Act also introduced the system of Panchayati Raj in rural areas and Municipality in urban areas. Also, Article 370 of the Constitution gives special status to the State of Jammu and Kashmir.

The constitution and the legislature
Main article: Amendment of the Constitution of India
See also: List of amendments of the Constitution of India
Amendment
The process of addition, variation or repeal of any part of the constitution by the Parliament under its constituent powers, is called amendment of the constitution.[42] The procedure is laid out in Article 368. An amendment bill must be passed by each House of the Parliament by a majority of the total membership of that House when at least two-thirds members are present and voted. In addition to this, certain amendments which pertain to the federal nature of the Constitution must be ratified by a majority of state legislatures. Unlike the ordinary bills under legislative powers of Parliament as per Article 245 (with exception to money bills), there is no provision for joint sitting of the two houses (Lok Sabha and Rajya Sabha) of the parliament to pass a constitutional amendment bill. During recess of Parliament, President can not promulgate ordinances under his legislative powers as per Article 123, Chapter III which needs constitutional amendment. Deemed amendments to the constitution which can be passed under legislative powers of Parliament, are no more valid after the addition of Article 368 (1) by Twenty-fourth Amendment of the Constitution of India.[42]

As of September 2015, there have been 120 amendment bills presented in the Parliament, out of which 100 have been passed to become Amendment Acts.[43] Most of these amendments address issues dealt with by statute in other democracies. However, the Constitution is so specific in spelling out government powers that many of these issues must be addressed by constitutional amendment. As a result, the document is amended roughly thrice in a two year's duration.

In 2000 the National Commission to Review the Working of the Constitution (NCRWC) was set up to look into updating the constitution.[44] Government of India, establishes term based law commissions to recommend law reforms for maximising justice in society and for promoting good governance under the rule of law.

Limitations
Main article: Basic structure doctrine
The Supreme Court has ruled in Kesavananda Bharati v. State of Kerala case that an amendment cannot destroy what it seeks to modify, which means while amending anything, it cannot tinker with the "basic structure" or framework of the constitution, which is immutable. Such an amendment will be declared invalid even though no part of the constitution is explicitly prevented from being amended, nor does the Basic Structure Doctrine protect any single provision of the Constitution. Yet, this "Doctrine of Basic Features" lays down that, the Constitution when "read as a whole", that what comes to be understood as its basic features cannot be abridged, deleted or abrogated. What these "basic features" are, have not been defined exhaustively anywhere,[37] and whether a particular provision of the Constitution of India is a "basic feature" is decided as and when an issue is raised before a court in an instant case.[45]

In the Golak Nath v. State of Punjab case of 1967, the Supreme Court ruled that the State of Punjab could not restrict any of the Fundamental rights protected by the basic structure doctrine.[46] Extent of land ownership and practice of profession, in this case, were held to be a fundamental right.[47] The ruling of the Golak Nath v. State of Punjab case was eventually overturned with the ratification of the 24th Amendment in 1971.[47]

The constitution and the judiciary
The Judiciary interprets the Constitution as its final arbiter.[48] It is its duty as mandated by the Constitution, to be its watchdog, by calling for scrutiny any act of the legislature or the executive, who otherwise, are free to enact or implement these, from overstepping bounds set for them by the Constitution.[49] It acts like a guardian in protecting the fundamental rights of the people, as enshrined in the Constitution, from infringement by any organ of the state. It also balances the conflicting exercise of power between the centre and a state or among states, as assigned to them by the Constitution.

While pronouncing decisions under its constitutional mandate, it is expected to remain unaffected by pulls and pressures exerted by other branches of the state, citizens or interest groups. And crucially, independence of the judiciary has been held to be a basic feature of the Constitution,[50][51] and which being inalienable, has come to mean - that which cannot be taken away from it by any act or amendment by the legislature or the executive.[52]

Judicial review
Judicial review is adopted in the Constitution of India from judicial review in the United States (see[53]). In the Indian constitution, Judicial review is dealt with under Article 43. Judicial Review refers that the Constitution is the supreme power of the nation and all laws are under its supremacy. Article 43 states that:

All pre-constitutional laws, if in part or completely in conflict with the Constitution, shall have all conflicting provisions deemed ineffective until an amendment to the Constitution ends the conflict. In such situation the provision of that law will again come into force, if it is compatible with the constitution as amended. This is called the Doctrine of Eclipse.[54]
In a similar manner, laws made after adoption of the Constitution by the Constituent Assembly must be compatible with the constitution, otherwise the laws and amendments will be deemed to be void ab initio.
In such situations, the Supreme Court or High Court interprets the laws to decide if they are in conformity with the Constitution. If such an interpretation is not possible because of inconsistency, and where a separation is possible, the provision that is inconsistent with constitution is considered to be void. In addition to article 13, articles 32, 226 and 227 provide a constitutional basis to judicial review in India.[55]
Due to the adoption of the thirty-eighth amendment, the Indian Supreme Court was not allowed to preside over any laws adopted during a state of emergency that infringes upon fundamental rights under article 32 i.e. Right to Constitutional Remedies.[56] Later with the Forty-second Amendment of the Constitution of India, article 31 C was widened and article 368(4) and 368(5) were added, which stated that any law passed by the parliament can't be challenged in the court on any ground. The Supreme court in the Minerva Mills v. Union of India case said that Judicial Review is one of the basic character of the constitution and therefore can't be taken away quashing Article 368(4)&(5) as well as 31 C.

The constitution - a living document
"The Indian Constitution is first and foremost a social document, and is aided by its Parts III & IV (Fundamental Rights & Directive Principles of State Policy, respectively) acting together, as its chief instruments and its conscience, in realising the goals set by it for all its people."[Note 7][57]

The Constitution's provisions have consciously been worded in generalities, though not in vague terms, instead of making them rigid and static with a fixed meaning or content as in an ordinary statute, so that they may be interpreted by coming generations of citizens with the onward march of time, to apply to new and ever-changing and demanding situations, making the Constitution a living and an organic document.[58] Justice Marshall asserts: “It is the nature of (a) Constitution that only its great outlines be marked”. It is a document intended “to endure for ages” and therefore, it has to be interpreted not merely on the basis of the intention and understanding of the its framers but on the experience of its working effectively, in the existing social and political context.

For instance, "right to life" as guaranteed under Article 21,[nb 1] has by interpretation been expanded to progressively mean a whole lot of human rights[nb 2]

In the conclusion of his Making of India's Constitution, Justice Khanna writes:

"If the Indian constitution is our heritage bequeathed to us by our founding fathers, no less are we, the people of India, the trustees and custodians of the values which pulsate within its provisions! A constitution is not a parchment of paper, it is a way of life and has to be lived up to. Eternal vigilance is the price of liberty and in the final analysis, its only keepers are the people."[62]

linkwikigovernmentagencies


1 Prime Minister’s Office (PMO)
3 Ministry of Home Affairs (India)
4 Ministry of Agriculture
5 Ministry of Chemicals and Fertilizers (Including Pharmaceuticals)
6 Ministry of Civil Aviation
7 Ministry of Coal
8 Ministry of Commerce and Industry/ Ministry of Business
8.1 Departments
8.2 Attached Offices
8.3 Autonomous Bodies
8.4 Boards
8.5 Commissions
8.6 Councils
8.7 Public Sector Undertakings
9 Ministry of Communications and Information Technology
9.1 Departments and Attached Offices
9.2 Autonomous Bodies
10 Ministry of Consumer Affairs, Food and Public Distribution
10.1 Departments
10.2 Directorates and other bodies
11 Ministry of Corporate Affairs
12 Ministry of Culture
12.1 Offices
12.2 Autonomous and other bodies
13 Ministry of Defence
13.1 Department of Defence
13.2 Department of Defence Research and Development
13.3 Department of Defence Production
13.4 Department of Ex-Servicemen Welfare
13.5 Finance Division
13.6 Intelligence Agencies
13.7 Inter-Service Organisations
13.8 Voluntary military agencies
14 Ministry of Earth Sciences
15 Ministry of Environment and Forests
15.1 Subordinate and statutory bodies
15.2 Autonomous bodies
16 Ministry of External Affairs
17 Ministry of Finance
17.1 Departments
17.2 Autonomous Agencies
18 Ministry of Food Processing Industries
19 Ministry of Health and Family Welfare
19.1 Department of Health
19.2 Department of Family Welfare
19.3 Department of AYUSH
20 Ministry of Heavy Industries and Public Enterprises
21 Ministry of Home Affairs
21.1 Department of Internal Security
22 Paramilitary forces
22.1 Department of Border Management
22.2 Bureaus
22.3 Autonomous Bodies, Boards & Corporations
22.4 Boards / Academies / Institutions (Grant in Aid)
22.5 Regulatory Authorities
22.6 Department of Official Language
23 Ministry of Housing and Urban Poverty Alleviation
24 Ministry of Human Resource Development
25 Ministry of Information and Broadcasting
26 Ministry of Labour and Employment
27 Ministry of Law and Justice
28 Ministry of Micro, Small and Medium Enterprises
29 Ministry of Mines
30 Ministry of Minority Affairs
31 Ministry of New and Renewable Energy
32 Ministry of Overseas Indian Affairs
33 Ministry of Panchayati Raj
34 Ministry of Parliamentary Affairs
35 Ministry of Personnel, Public Grievances and Pensions
35.1 Department of Personnel and Training
35.2 Department of Administrative Reforms and Public Grievances
36 Ministry of Petroleum and Natural Gas
37 Ministry of Power
37.1 Power Boards / Undertakings
38 Statutory Bodies, Commissions & Councils
39 Ministry of Railways
40 Ministry of Road Transport and Highways
40.1 Agencies
41 Ministry of Rural Development
42 Ministry of Science & Technology
42.1 Department of Biotechnology
42.2 Department of Ocean Development
42.3 Department of Scientific & Industrial Research
42.4 Department of Science & Technology
43 Ministry of Social Justice and Empowerment
44 Ministry of Statistics and Programme Implementation
44.1 Departments
44.2 Autonomous Bodies
45 Ministry of Steel
46 Ministry of Textiles
46.1 Autonomous Bodies
46.2 Export Promotion Councils
46.3 Textiles Research Associations
46.4 Public Sector Undertakings
47 Ministry of Tourism
48 Ministry of Tribal Affairs
49 Ministry of Urban Development
50 Ministry of Water Resources
51 Ministry of Women and Child Development
51.1 Statutory Body
52 Ministry of Youth Affairs and Sports
53 Independent Departments
53.1 Department of Atomic Energy
53.2 Department of Space
54 Independent Agencies/Bodies
55 Intelligence
55.1 National
55.2 Economic
55.3 Military
56 Law enforcement
57 Tribunals in India
58 Constitution of India
59 Parliamentary democracy
60 Union Council of Ministers of India
61 Foreign relations of India
62 National Portal of India
63 National Social-media Portal
64 Cabinet of India
65 Ministry,Ministry of,Bodies,enforcement,of india,National,Associations,Council,Intelligence,department,agencies,Bureau,boards,Tribunals,Constitution,foreign relations,attached offices,undertaking,PMO,Inter-Service Organisations,INDIA Limited,Controller,commissioner,fund organization,general of,indian institute,limited,national institute,
national crime,national civil,academy,control bureau,indian service,security guard,security force,border force,special force,defence security,border police,training academy,


